Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,174
Health care review committee; information and records; confidentiality.

(1) The information considered by a health care review committee and the records of their actions and proceedings shall be confidential and not subject to subpoena or order to produce except in proceedings before the appropriate state licensing or certifying agency or in an appeal from the committee's findings or recommendations. No member of a health care review committee, no officer, director, or other member of a health maintenance organization or its staff engaged in assisting such committee, and no person assisting or furnishing information to such committee may be subpoenaed to testify in any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding if such subpoena is based solely on such activities.

(2) Information considered by a health care review committee and the records of its actions and proceedings which are used pursuant to subsection (1) of this section by a state licensing or certifying agency or in an appeal shall be kept confidential and shall be subject to the same provisions concerning discovery and use in legal actions as the original information and records in the possession and control of a health care review committee.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 83.